src/fst/test/old-gt-norm-yamls/V-TI-natam_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - nâtam - ok : # Ordinary TI verb - Wolvengrey p. 395; Fut+Def from Okimāsis p. 36 

  
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+1Sg:    ninâtên # INDEPENDENT
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+2Sg:    kinâtên
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+3Sg:    nâtam
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl: nâtamiyiwa
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+1Pl:    ninâtênân
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+12Pl:   [kinâtênaw, kinâtênânaw]
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+2Pl:    kinâtênâwâw
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+3Pl:    nâtamwak

     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg:    ê-nâtamân # CONJUNCT
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg:    ê-nâtaman
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg:    ê-nâtahk
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl: ê-nâtamiyit
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl:    ê-nâtamâhk
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl:   ê-nâtamahk
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl:    ê-nâtamêk
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl:    ê-nâtahkik

     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+1Sg:    nikî-nâtên # PRT-INDEPENDENT
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+2Sg:    kikî-nâtên
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+3Sg:    kî-nâtam
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+4Sg/Pl: kî-nâtamiyiwa
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+1Pl:    nikî-nâtênân
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+12Pl:   [kikî-nâtênaw, kikî-nâtênânaw]
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+2Pl:    kikî-nâtênâwâw
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+3Pl:    kî-nâtamwak

     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+1Sg:    ê-kî-nâtamân # PRT-CONJUNCT
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+2Sg:    ê-kî-nâtaman
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+3Sg:    ê-kî-nâtahk
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+4Sg/Pl: ê-kî-nâtamiyit
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+1Pl:    ê-kî-nâtamâhk
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+12Pl:   ê-kî-nâtamahk
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+2Pl:    ê-kî-nâtamêk
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+3Pl:    ê-kî-nâtahkik


     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg:    niwî-nâtên # FUT+INT-INDEPENDENT
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg:    kiwî-nâtên
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg:    wî-nâtam
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: wî-nâtamiyiwa
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl:    niwî-nâtênân
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl:   [kiwî-nâtênaw, kiwî-nâtênânaw]
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl:    kiwî-nâtênâwâw
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl:    wî-nâtamwak

     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Sg:    ê-wî-nâtamân # FUT+INT-CONJUNCT
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Sg:    ê-wî-nâtaman
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+3Sg:    ê-wî-nâtahk
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: ê-wî-nâtamiyit
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Pl:    ê-wî-nâtamâhk
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+12Pl:   ê-wî-nâtamahk
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Pl:    ê-wî-nâtamêk
     PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+3Pl:    ê-wî-nâtahkik

     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg:    nika-nâtên # FUT+DEF-INDEPENDENT
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg:    kika-nâtên
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg:    ka-nâtam
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+4Sg/Pl: ka-nâtamiyiwa
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl:    nika-nâtênân
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl:   [kika-nâtênaw, kika-nâtênânaw]
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl:    kika-nâtênâwâw
     nâtam+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl:    ka-nâtamwak
     
     nâtam+V+TI+Fut+Cond+1Sg:    nâtamâni
     nâtam+V+TI+Fut+Cond+2Sg:    nâtamani
     nâtam+V+TI+Fut+Cond+3Sg:    nâtahki
     nâtam+V+TI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: nâtamiyici
     nâtam+V+TI+Fut+Cond+1Pl:    nâtamâhki
     nâtam+V+TI+Fut+Cond+12Pl:   [nâtamahki, nâtamahko]
     nâtam+V+TI+Fut+Cond+2Pl:    nâtamêko
     nâtam+V+TI+Fut+Cond+3Pl:    nâtahkwâwi

     nâtam+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Sg:  nâta
     nâtam+V+TI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: nâtêtân
     nâtam+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Pl:  nâtamok


     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-nâtamômâw] # com SET I
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtamômâw]
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-nâtamômânân]
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtamômânaw]
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtamômâwâw]
     
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-nâtamômâwak] # com SET I-Pl
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtamômâwak]
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-nâtamômânânak]
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtamômânawak]
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtamômâwâwak]

     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtamômin] # com SET II
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtamôminân]
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtamôminâwâw]
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtamôminân]


     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nâtamômêw] # com SET III
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nâtamômêwak]
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nâtamômêyiwa]
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nâtamômimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nâtamômimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-nâtamômimâwa] # com SET IV
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtamômimâwa]
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-nâtamômimânâna]
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtamômimânawa]
     nâtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtamômimâwâwa]
    
     

     
